src/morphology/stems/fin-abbreviations.lexc
! ===================================================
!! !!!Continuation lexicons for Finnish abbreviations
! ===================================================

!!  Abbreviations are shortened forms that do not inflect. They have whatever
!!  classification they would have if they were read out, mostly that of nouns.
!!  Lot of abbreviations end in a full stop, which may complicate analysis and
!!  tokenisation in real-world applications

LEXICON ABBREVIATION
ITRAB ; ! For abbr that may impose sent bound
TRNUMAB ; ! For abbr that do not impose sent bound before numerals
TRAB ; ! for abbreviations that do not impose sentence boundary
!!€gt-norm:  Abbreviations
!!€  eaa.: eaa.+N
!!€  esim.: esim.+N
!!$  esim: esim+N
!!  Some ar less classified
!!€ ab: ab+ABBR

LEXICON ITRAB
alv.+N:alv.  ab-dot-noun-itrab  ;
a.m.+N:a.m.  ab-dot-noun-itrab  ;
anon.+N:anon.  ab-dot-noun-itrab  ;

LEXICON TRNUMAB 
n%:ro+N:n%:ro   ab-dot-noun-trnumab  ;
nro+N:nro  ab-dot-noun-trnumab  ;
krnro+N:krnro  ab-dot-noun-trnumab  ;
